Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.520

Compilation, codification, revision of city or town ordinances—Adoption as official code of city.

Any city or town having heretofore prepared or caused to be prepared, or now preparing or causing to be prepared, or that hereafter prepares or causes to be prepared, a codification of its ordinances may adopt such codification by enacting an ordinance adopting such codification as the official code of the city, provided the procedure and requirements of RCW 35.21.500 through 35.21.570 are complied with.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.21.520. Prior: 1957 c 97 s 3.]